Illinois, session 104th, HB5328.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title; references to Act. 5    (a) Short title. This Act may be cited as the 6Servicemember Education Rights Veneration Act.7    (b) References to Act. This Act may be referred to as the 8SERVE Act. 9ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS 10    Section 1-5. Legislative intent. As a guide to the 11interpretation and application of this Act, the public policy 12of the State is declared as follows:13    (a) The General Assembly recognizes the common public 14interest in safeguarding and promoting participation in 15military service to the United States and the State by:16        (1) minimizing disadvantages to military service while 17    pursuing higher education;18        (2) providing prompt readmission and preservation of 19    academic status for service member students returning from 20    military service in a manner that (A) minimizes disruption 21    to academic pursuits and (B) limits institutional legal 22    risk associated with developing and granting   HB5328 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1    accommodations; and2        (3) prohibiting discrimination against and 3    interference with military service.4    (b) This law shall be interpreted as comprising a 5foundation of protections guaranteed by this Act; therefore, 6nothing in this Act shall supersede, nullify, or diminish any 7federal or State law, including any local law or ordinance, 8contract, agreement, policy, plan, practice, or other matter 9that establishes a right or benefit that is more beneficial 10to, or is in addition to, a right or benefit provided in this 11Act. 12    (c) This Act shall be liberally construed to effectuate 13its purposes and provisions for the benefit of the service 14member student who has volunteered to serve this country and 15this State despite the risk of interruption in the pursuit of 16higher education. Such sacrifice benefits everyone but is made 17by relatively few. 18    (d) This Act requires institutions of higher education to 19think beyond their existing policy and practice to act in 20practical ways that better accommodate service member students 21whose participation in military service presents individually 22unique and complicated challenges.23    (e) The new service member benefits provided under this 24Act apply on and after the effective date of this Act. 25    Section 1-10. Definitions. As used in this Act:  HB5328 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1    "Academic military leave" means any period of leave of 2absence by a service member student to perform military 3service.4    "Academic status" means a service member student's 5academic position in an institution of higher education in 6terms of academic program, enrollment status, credit or clock 7hours completed, academic standing, and academic progress.8    "Academic program" means a set of academic requirements 9that lead to a degree, diploma, certificate, or any other such 10credential.11    "Academic progress" means the degree to which a service 12member student is on track to graduate on time and is meeting 13the institution's academic standards for satisfactory 14completion of an academic program.15    "Academic standing" means grade point average. 16    "Academic year division" means the method in which an 17institution divides the academic year, including semester, 18quarter, trimester, 4-1-4 system, 4-4-1 system, continuous or 19year-round, block, 3-term system, or any other such method of 20determining the division of an academic year.21    "Accommodation" means a mutually agreed upon modification 22between a service member student and the institution to 23academic coursework that creates an opportunity for a service 24member student to avoid negative impact on academic status 25because of academic military leave. "Accommodation" includes, 26but is not limited to, make-up work, flexible deadlines,   HB5328 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1alternative assignments, make-up exams, accessing missed 2lecture materials, remote participation, extended time for 3tasks, course adjustments, and opportunities to complete 4assignments, tasks, exams, and other course requirements 5earlier than their respective due dates. 6    "Appropriate military authority" means any commissioned, 7warrant, or noncommissioned officer authorized to issue orders 8for military service in the Armed Forces of the United States 9or the National Guard of any state or territory.10    "Discrimination" means any unjust or prejudicial 11treatment, including, but not limited to, harassment, based on 12perceived or actual association or affiliation with military 13service. 14    "Enrollment status" means whether a service member student 15is full-time, part-time, half-time, withdrawn, degree-seeking, 16non-degree seeking, a graduate, on leave, or any other such 17matriculation relationship to the institution or program. 18    "Financial aid" means any moneys, including, but not 19limited to, grants, scholarships, work-study, and loans, 20provided to help service member students in remunerating an 21institution of higher education. It includes veterans' 22education benefits such as those provided under the 23Servicemen's Readjustment Act of 1944 and the Illinois Veteran 24grant program under the Higher Education Student Assistance 25Act. 26    "Institution" or "institution of higher education" means a   HB5328 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1public or private college, university, or other institution 2that provides postsecondary education and awards degrees, 3diplomas, certificates, or other such credential. 4    "ISERRA Advocate" means the Illinois Service Member 5Employment and Reemployment Rights Act Advocate appointed by 6the Attorney General under Section 30-5 of the Service Member 7Employment and Reemployment Rights Act.8    "Military accommodation" means specific accommodation 9granted by, and at the sole discretion of, appropriate 10military authority with respect to a service member student. 11It may be requested by the service member student or an 12institution and relates to the timing, frequency, and duration 13of impending academic military leave with the sole purpose to 14prevent or limit negative impact on a service member student's 15academic status.16    "Military service" means a service member student receives 17orders in the Armed Forces of the United States, the National 18Guard of any state or territory regardless of status or 19voluntariness, or the Illinois State Guard as described in the 20State Guard Act. "Military service" includes service under the 21authority of U.S.C. Titles 10, 14, or 32, or state active duty. 22"Military service" includes active and inactive duty.23    "Reasonable efforts" means actions taken to accommodate 24service member students due to academic military leave, but 25does not require significant difficulty, or expense on the 26operation of the institution of higher education or on   HB5328 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1education standards. 2    "Service member student" means a person enrolled in an 3institution of higher education who is eligible to be ordered 4to military service, or in the case of such person's spouse, 5whose pursuit of higher education is adversely impacted by 6such service.7    "Volunteer orders" means reserve component voluntary 8active service as that term is defined in Section 1-10 of the 9Service Member Employment and Reemployment Rights Act. 10    Section 1-15. Applicability. This Act applies when 11military duty presents a conflict with academic status. This 12Act is not meant as a substitute for poor planning on the part 13of the service member student. This Act does not apply where 14there is no conflict between institutional and military 15service requirements. Nothing in this Act prohibits an 16institution from acting consistently with established policy 17and procedure for dealing with misconduct on the part of a 18service member student.  19ARTICLE 5. ACCOMMODATION AND READMISSION REQUIREMENTS 20    Section 5-5. Readmission. 21    (a) Institutions shall accommodate service member 22student's academic military leave and grant prompt readmission 23when the service member student:  HB5328 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1        (1) has not exceeded a cumulative academic military 2    leave period beyond 5 years;3        (2) provides advance notice of academic military leave 4    to the institution; and5        (3) provides notice of intent to return to the 6    institution.7    (b) Prompt readmission. The institution must readmit a 8service member student on academic military leave into the 9next class, classes, or academic year division following the 10receipt of the notice of intent to return in accordance with 11the terms of the accommodation. 12    (c) Exemptions to readmission. A service member student's 13eligibility for readmission under this Act terminates upon the 14occurrence of any of the following events:15        (1) A separation of such service member student from 16    military service with a dishonorable or bad conduct 17    discharge.18        (2) A dismissal from military service in the case of a 19    service member student who is a commissioned or warrant 20    officer.21        (3) A dropping of such service member student from the 22    rolls. 23    (d) The service member student has an obligation to timely 24self-report to the institution when any of the exemptions to 25readmission listed in subsection (c) occur.26    (e) A service member student shall provide documentation   HB5328 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1demonstrating applicability of exemptions upon request by the 2institution, subject to the following: 3        (1) The institution cannot request specific 4    documentation.5        (2) Documentation provided shall be from appropriate 6    military authority.7        (3) Documentation shall be provided as soon as 8    practicable. 9    (f) Rights and benefits under this Act shall not be 10withheld until an exemption becomes evident. 11    (g) Loss of readmission rights under this Act subjects the 12service member student to the institution's applicable 13policies and procedures. 14    (h) When an institution has reason to believe that an 15exemption may be applicable but is not reported, the 16institution shall notify the Attorney General's ISERRA 17Advocate. Upon receiving notification, the Attorney General 18shall investigate to determine if an exemption exists. 19Intentional failure to timely report an applicable exemption 20shall result in loss of readmission and preservation of 21academic status rights under this Act and subjects the service 22member student to the institution's applicable policies and 23procedures. When failure to report involves the use of public 24funds, the Attorney General shall investigate to determine if 25any law has been violated and if recoupment of public funds is 26warranted. Results of any investigation may be shared with   HB5328 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1appropriate military authority at the discretion of the 2Attorney General.  3    Section 5-10. Academic military leave. 4    (a) Permission. A service member student is not required 5to get permission from his or her institution for academic 6military leave. The service member student is only required to 7provide advance notice of pending military service in 8accordance with this Act. Advance notice entitles a service 9member student to academic military leave. 10    (b) Conditions. An institution of higher education may not 11impose conditions for academic military leave not otherwise 12imposed under this Act or other applicable law. 13        (1) This subsection shall not be construed to prevent 14    an institution from providing conditions as part of 15    academic accommodation.16        (2) This subsection shall not be construed to prevent 17    an institution from establishing reasonable policies, 18    procedures, and practice in furtherance of this Act.19    (c) Military accommodation. A service member student is 20not required to accommodate an institution's needs as to the 21timing, frequency, or duration of academic military leave; 22however, institutions are permitted and encouraged to request 23accommodations that benefit the service member student in 24advance of such academic military leave, subject to the 25following:  HB5328 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1        (1) Such requests shall be in collaboration with and 2    in the best interest of service member students.3        (2) Such requests shall be directed to the attention 4    of the appropriate military authority. 5        (3) The accommodation of such requests is subject to 6    military law and discretion.7    (d) Academic obligation not excused. Academic military 8leave alone does not excuse a service member student from any 9academic obligation except at the sole discretion of the 10institution as part of an accommodation.  11    Section 5-15. Accommodation. 12    (a) Notice of pending academic military leave entitles 13service member students to institutional accommodation.14    (b) Accommodations. Accommodation made by an institution 15of higher education under this Act is subject to the 16following: 17        (1) Shall become a mutually agreed upon contract 18    conditioned on tasks that both sides must complete to 19    fulfill the agreement. 20        (2) Shall be in writing such as in an email, letter, or 21    some other written form.22        (3) Shall not violate any law prohibiting 23    discrimination.24        (4) Shall not violate any rights granted by this Act 25    or other law.  HB5328 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1        (5) Shall be created with the purpose of compliance 2    with this Act.3        (6) Shall benefit the service member student.4        (7) Shall be tailored to the unique academic status, 5    military requirements, and circumstantial constraints 6    specific to each service member student who finds himself 7    or herself in a position warranting accommodation.8        (8) Shall be amendable when a material condition 9    changes or upon agreement by the institution and the 10    service member student.11        (9) Shall present a reasonable opportunity for the 12    service member student to maintain academic status as 13    follows:14            (A) Readmission into the same academic program is 15        subject to the following: 16                (i) If the specific academic program is no 17            longer offered but the coursework can be 18            completed, then the service member student shall 19            be given the opportunity to complete the 20            coursework for that academic program. 21                (ii) If the coursework is not available, then 22            the service member student shall be admitted into 23            the academic program that is most similar to his 24            or her original academic program. 25            (B) Readmission to the same academic enrollment 26        status.  HB5328 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1            (C) Readmission with the same number of credit 2        hours or clock hours unless the service member student 3        is readmitted to a different academic program to which 4        the completed credit hours or clock hours are not 5        transferable.6            (D) Readmission with the same academic standing 7        subject to changes in grade point average resulting 8        from any accommodation.9            (E) Readmission with the same academic progress. 10        (10) The specifics of and nature of any accommodation 11    shall be at the sole discretion of the institution of 12    higher education under consultation with the service 13    member student.14        (11) Shall be reasonable under the circumstances.15        (12) Shall not require, plan, or depend on the 16    performance of coursework during academic military leave 17    subject to the provision that nothing in this subsection 18    prevents a service member student from performing 19    coursework during academic military leave on the service 20    member student's own initiative.21    (c) Accommodations shall not create a broad rule, policy, 22or practice applicable beyond the terms of the specific 23accommodation applicable to a specific service member student, 24except at the sole discretion of the institution of higher 25education.26    (d) Reimbursement. All expenses, including, but not   HB5328 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1limited to, tuition, fees, and penalties, charged by the 2institution are fully refundable for any academic year 3division the institution determines that withdrawal, due to 4military service, is the only appropriate accommodation based 5on the characteristics of the academic military leave in 6question subject to the following: 7        (1) Financial aid. Financial aid shall be credited for 8    the academic year division requiring withdrawal due to 9    military service, unless expressly prohibited by the terms 10    of such financial aid and impossible or unreasonable under 11    the circumstances.12        (2) Scholarship, grant, or loan. A service member 13    student's eligibility for a State-supported scholarship, 14    grant, or loan for attendance at an institution shall not 15    be adversely affected by the service member student's 16    failure to complete coursework because of the service 17    member student's military service. 18        (3) Housing. The service member student may be charged 19    for any period in which student housing is occupied by the 20    service member student and subject to the federal 21    Servicemembers Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. 3900 et seq.).22        (4) Textbooks. If a service member student must 23    withdraw from any course due to military service, the 24    service member student shall receive the maximum price, 25    based on condition, for textbooks purchased from the 26    bookstore associated with the institution.   HB5328 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1        (5) All other expenses. All other expenses charged by 2    the institution and in which the service member student 3    has used or taken advantage of shall be reimbursed pro 4    rata. If determining the pro rata share is not possible, 5    then the service member student shall be reimbursed the 6    full amount. 7    (e) Withdrawal due to military service. A service member 8student who is unable to continue in a course due to military 9service shall be allowed to withdraw with no impact upon the 10final grade point average of the service member student. Such 11withdrawal shall be identified on any academic transcript as 12"withdrawal due to military service" so as not to prejudice 13the service member student. If the service member student is 14required to withdraw, such withdrawal shall not disadvantage 15the service member student as to readmission or re-enrollment. 16    (f) Academic military leave does not count toward any 17limit on attendance. 18    (g) Mutual accommodation. Any requirement of academic 19status is deemed met if the service member student requests 20and the institution grants a different academic program, 21enrollment status, credit or clock hours, or academic 22progress. Such accommodation shall not be recognized if made 23in lieu of the service member student's preferred benefit 24under law, policy, practice, or agreement. 25    (h) Re-enrollment not possible. If the institution 26determines that the service member student is not prepared to   HB5328 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1resume in the same academic status as required in this Act due 2to standards outside their control, the institution must make 3reasonable efforts to help the service member student become 4prepared to resume in the same academic status, including, but 5not limited to, providing refresher courses, refresher 6training, and an opportunity to retake any examination. Such 7efforts shall be at no extra cost to service member students. 8If, after reasonable efforts on the part of the institution, 9the service member student is unable to resume in the same 10academic status, then the obligation to readmit the service 11member student in the same academic status is deemed to have 12been met. 13    (i) Rejection of accommodation. Rejection of accommodation 14that meets the requirements of this Act by a service member 15student shall subject the service member student to the 16institution's applicable policies and procedures. Good faith 17negotiations on the part of the service member student or 18representative do not constitute rejection of the 19accommodation. 20    (j) Burden of proof. The institution of higher education 21carries the burden to show, by a preponderance of the 22evidence, that:23        (1) the service member student is re-enrolled in the 24    same or most similar academic program and status;25        (2) reasonable efforts have been made to prepare the 26    service member student to resume in the same or most   HB5328 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1    similar academic program and status;2        (3) reasonable efforts made have failed through no 3    fault of the institution; and4        (4) no other reasonable efforts are available to the 5    institution. 6    Section 5-20. Five-year limit. 7    (a) Five-year limit. In computing the 5-year limit, the 8academic military leave shall not include any of the following 9military service: 10        (1) service that is required, beyond 5 years, to 11    complete an initial period of obligated military service;12        (2) periods in which the service member student was 13    unable to obtain orders releasing the service member 14    student from military service before the expiration of the 15    5-year period and such inability was through no fault of 16    the service member student; or17        (3) performed by a service member student who is:18            (A) ordered to or retained on active duty under 19        Section 688, 12301(a), 12301(g), 12302, 12304, or 20        12305 of Title 10 of the United States Code or under 21        Section 331, 332, 359, 360, 367, or 712 of Title 14 of 22        the United States Code;23            (B) ordered to or retained on active duty, other 24        than for training, under any provision of law because 25        of war or emergency declared by the President,   HB5328 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1        Congress, the Secretary of a military department, or 2        the Governor of the State;3            (C) ordered to active duty, other than for 4        training, in support, as determined by the Secretary 5        of a military department, of an operational mission 6        for which personnel have been ordered to active duty 7        under Section 12304 of Title 10 of the United States 8        Code;9            (D) ordered to active duty in support, as 10        determined by the Secretary of a military department, 11        of a critical mission or requirement of military 12        service; 13            (E) called into federal service as a member of the 14        National Guard under Chapter 15 of Title 10 or under 15        Section 12406 of Title 10 of the United States Code; or16            (F) called into State Active Duty.17    (b) Documentation. It is the responsibility of the 18institution to determine the applicability of the 5-year limit 19by maintaining records of periods of academic military leave; 20however, institutions may request documentation necessary to 21determine if the 5-year rule has been exceeded. Upon request, 22a service member student shall provide the documentation as 23soon as practicable. The institution cannot request specific 24documentation. The documentation provided shall be from an 25appropriate military authority. The institution's requests for 26documentation are subject to the following:  HB5328 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1        (1) The request must be reasonable. 2        (2) A service member student must be permitted to 3    continue course work unless and until the documentation, 4    once provided, demonstrates the 5-year limit has been 5    exceeded. 6    (c) Exceeding the 5-year limit. Exceeding the 5-year limit 7does not obligate an institution to deny readmission. 8Readmission and conditions thereof are at the sole discretion 9of the institution. 10    (d) The institution may notify the Attorney General's 11ISERRA Advocate when the documentation is not provided timely. 12The Attorney General shall take steps necessary to ensure the 13appropriate documentation is provided. 14    Section 5-25. Advance notice. 15    (a) Advance notice entitles a service member student to an 16accommodation and shall be provided in accordance with the 17following:18        (1) Notice must be provided in advance of military 19    service unless circumstances make such advance notice 20    impossible or unreasonable under the circumstances. In 21    this case, advance notice shall be provided as soon as it 22    becomes practicable under the circumstances.23        (2) Notice shall be written but may be verbal if 24    written notice is not reasonable under the circumstances. 25    No required format or rule for timeliness may be imposed.  HB5328 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1        (3) Notice shall be provided by the service member 2    student, spouse of such service member student, or 3    appropriate military authority.4        (4) Notice shall be provided to each applicable 5    instructor or, if designated by the institution, to the 6    appropriate official. 7    (b) Failure to provide advance notice. Failure to provide 8advance notice subjects the service member student to the 9applicable institution's policies and procedures.10    (c) Exception; military necessity. No notice is required 11if the giving of such notice is precluded by military 12necessity, such as when such military service is classified or 13when notice may compromise or adversely affect a military 14mission, operation, or exercise if known by the public as 15determined by appropriate military authority in writing. Such 16writing need only declare military necessity without further 17explanation and may be provided at any time, up to and 18including, with a notice of intent to return. 19    Section 5-30. Notice of intent to return. Notice of intent 20to return shall be provided to the institution placing the 21service member student on academic military leave consistent 22with the following:23        (1) Intent to return is presumed for academic military 24    leave less than 31 days. 25        (2) Intent to return is presumed when return is part   HB5328 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1    of an established accommodation.2        (3) Notice of intent to return may be provided at any 3    time between advance notice and within 3 years from the 4    end of the academic military leave period. 5        (4) Notice of intent to return requirement is not met 6    when it is provided later than 3 years after the 7    completion of military service unless a service member 8    student is hospitalized or convalescing from an illness or 9    injury incurred in or aggravated during such military 10    service. In this case, notice of intent to return is not 11    met when it is provided later than 2 years after the end of 12    the period reasonably necessary for recovery of such 13    illness or injury.14        (5) Failure to provide notice of intent to return 15    subjects the service member student to the institution's 16    established policies and procedures. 17        (6) Notice of intent to return shall be provided to 18    each applicable instructor or, when designated by the 19    institution, to the appropriate official. 20        (7) Notice of intent to return shall be written and in 21    no particular format.22        (8) Notice of intent to return may be waived by, and at 23    the sole discretion of, the institution. Waiver may be 24    verbal or written or established in policy or procedure. 25    Section 5-35. Discrimination.   HB5328 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1    (a) A person who is a member of, applies to be a member of, 2performs, has performed, applies to perform, or has an 3obligation to perform military service shall not be 4discriminated against by an institution of higher education, 5including its faculty and staff on the basis of that 6membership, application for membership, performance of 7service, obligation, or actual or perceived affiliation with 8military service.9    (b) A person who is a spouse or dependent of a person 10described in subsection (a) shall not be discriminated against 11by an institution, faculty, or staff based on actual or 12perceived affiliation or association with such person 13described in subsection (a).14    (c) Military service does not need to be the sole reason 15for discriminatory behavior to be discriminatory but must be, 16in part, a basis. 17    Section 5-40. Military spouse. The spouse of a service 18member called to military service may withdraw, without 19penalty, when such service adversely interferes with the 20pursuit of higher education of such spouse. Withdrawal shall 21be marked as "withdrawal due to military service" so as not to 22prejudice such service member spouse. Such service member 23spouse shall be entitled to a full refund except for a pro rata 24share of services used.    HB5328 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1    Section 5-45. Notice of rights and duties. 2    (a) Each institution shall provide service member students 3entitled to rights and benefits under this Act with a notice of 4the rights, benefits, and obligations of service member 5students under this Act provided by the Attorney General's 6ISERRA Advocate.7    (b) The requirement for the provision of notice under this 8Act may be met by the posting of the notice where the 9institution customarily places notices for service member 10students. 11ARTICLE 10. COMPLIANCE 12    Section 10-5. Violation. Any violation of Article 5 is a 13violation of this Act. 14    Section 10-15. Private right enforcement. A person may 15bring a private civil action for enforcement of a violation of 16this Act.  17    Section 10-20. Circuit court action by the Attorney 18General. 19    (a) If the Attorney General has reason to believe that any 20institution is engaged in a violation of this Act, then the 21Attorney General may commence a civil action in the name of the 22People of the State on behalf of persons within the State to   HB5328 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1enforce the provisions of this Act in any appropriate circuit 2court. 3    (b) Prior to initiating a civil action, the Attorney 4General shall conduct a preliminary investigation to determine 5whether there is reason to believe that any institution is 6engaged in a violation of this Act and whether the dispute can 7be resolved without litigation. In conducting this 8investigation, the Attorney General may:9        (1) require the individual or entity to file a 10    statement or report in writing under oath or otherwise as 11    to all information the Attorney General may consider 12    necessary;13        (2) examine under oath any person alleged to have 14    participated in or with the knowledge of the alleged 15    violation; or16        (3) issue subpoenas or conduct hearings in aid of any 17    investigation.18    (c) Service by the Attorney General of any notice 19requiring a person to file a statement or report, or of a 20subpoena upon any person, shall be made:21        (1) personally, by delivery of a duly executed copy 22    thereof to the person to be served or, if a person is not a 23    natural person, in the manner provided by the Civil 24    Procedure law when a complaint is filed; or25        (2) by mailing by certified mail a duly executed copy 26    thereof to the person to be served at his or her last known   HB5328 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1    abode or principal place of business within this State.2    (d) In lieu of civil action, the individual or entity 3alleged to have violated this Act may enter into an Assurance 4of Voluntary Compliance with respect to the alleged violation. 5Evidence of a violation of an Assurance of Voluntary 6Compliance shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of 7this Act in any subsequent proceeding brought by the Attorney 8General against the alleged violator.9    (e) Whenever any person fails to comply with any subpoena 10issued under this Section or whenever satisfactory copying or 11reproduction of any material requested in an investigation 12cannot be done, and the person refuses to surrender the 13material, the Attorney General may file in any appropriate 14circuit court, and serve upon the person, a petition for a 15court order for the enforcement of the subpoena or other 16request.17    Any person who has received a subpoena issued under 18subsection (b) may file in the appropriate circuit court, and 19serve upon the Attorney General, a petition for a court order 20to modify or set aside the subpoena or other requests. The 21petition must be filed either: (1) within 20 days after the 22date of service of the subpoena or at any time before the 23return date specified in the subpoena, whichever date is 24earlier, or (2) within a longer period as may be prescribed in 25writing by the Attorney General. 26    The petition shall specify each ground upon which the   HB5328 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1petitioner relies in seeking relief under this subsection and 2may be based upon any failure of the subpoena to comply with 3the provision of this Section or upon any constitutional or 4other legal right or privilege of the petitioner. During the 5pendency of the petition in the court, the court may stay, as 6it deems proper, the running of the time allowed for 7compliance with the subpoena or other request, in whole or in 8part, except that the petitioner shall comply with any portion 9of the subpoena or other request not sought to be modified or 10set aside. 11    Section 10-25. Remedies. 12    (a) A court in its discretion may award actual damages or 13any other relief that the court deems proper. Punitive damages 14are not authorized except in cases involving violations under 15Section 5-35 prohibiting discrimination, or in a case where 16intent to subvert the purpose of this Act can be shown. In no 17case may punitive damages exceed $500,000 per violation. 18Reasonable attorney fees may be awarded to the prevailing 19party; however, prevailing defendants may only receive 20attorney's fees if the court makes a finding that the 21plaintiff acted in bad faith. 22    (b) The Attorney General may bring an action in the name of 23the people of the State against any institution to restrain by 24preliminary or permanent injunction the use of any practice 25that violates this Act. In such an action, the court may award   HB5328 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1restitution. In addition, the court may assess a civil penalty 2not to exceed $50,000 per violation of this Act. 3    (c) If a court orders a party to make payments to the 4Attorney General and the payments are to be used for the 5operations of the Office of the Attorney General or if a party 6agrees to make payment to the Attorney General for the 7operations of the Office of the Attorney General as part of an 8Assurance of Voluntary Compliance, then the moneys paid under 9any of the conditions described in this subsection (c) shall 10be deposited into the Attorney General Court Ordered and 11Voluntary Compliance Payment Projects Fund. Moneys in the Fund 12shall be used, subject to the appropriation, for the 13performance of any function pertaining to the exercise of the 14duties of the Attorney General including, but not limited to, 15enforcement of any law of this State and conducting public 16education programs; however, any moneys in the Fund that are 17required by the court or by an agreement to be used for a 18particular purpose shall be used for that purpose.19    (d) In any action brought under the provisions of this 20Act, the Attorney General is entitled to recover costs.21    (e) If an investigation by the Attorney General finds that 22the institution has acted in bad faith, a report shall be sent 23to both State and federal entities that oversee colleges and 24universities in any capacity. 25ARTICLE 15. STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS, ISERRA ADVOCATE, RULES AND   HB5328 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1ELECTION 2    Section 15-5. Inapplicability of statute of limitations. 3No statute of limitations applies to any private right or 4Attorney General action under this Act. 5    Section 15-20. ISERRA Advocate. 6    (a) The ISERRA Advocate appointed by the Attorney General 7under Section 30-5 of the Service Member Employment and 8Reemployment Rights Act shall enforce this Act on behalf of 9the Attorney General.10    (b) Through the ISERRA Advocate, the Attorney General 11shall have the power to:12        (1) establish and make available a program to provide 13    training to institutions and service member students;14        (2) prepare and make available interpretive and 15    educational materials and programs;16        (3) respond to informal inquiries made by 17    institutions, service member students, and interested 18    members of the public;19        (4) prepare and make available the notice required 20    under Section 5-45 on the rights, benefits, and 21    obligations under this Act; and22        (5) investigate allegations of violations of this Act 23    on behalf of the Attorney General.   HB5328 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 17800 KTG 31233 b1    Section 15-25. Rules. To accomplish the objectives and to 2carry out the duties prescribed by this Act, the Attorney 3General may adopt any rules necessary to implement this Act. 4    Section 15-30. Governor's election. In a time of national 5or State emergency, the Governor has the authority to 6designate persons as entitled to protections under this Act.